District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-256

Resident Council Advisory Board and tenant election of members of resident councils and Resident Council Advisory Board.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-243, § 8, 42 DCR 91
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401(f), 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-126.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 29 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-259, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1129).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 29 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-346, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 4980).

Editor's Notes

Purpose of Law 10-243: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 6-251.